Colorado, session 2026A, HB1021.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Second
Amendment Protection Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) For more than 15 years, the state of Colorado and successive
general assemblies have waged an unrelenting and deliberate assault on
the constitutional right of the people to keep and bear arms. Under the
false pretense of public safety, lawmakers have enacted a steady stream
of punitive, ideologically driven gun control measures designed not to
stop criminals but to exhaust, intimidate, and disarm law-abiding citizens.
-3- HB26-1021

(b) In the 2 most recent regular legislative sessions, the general
assembly passed more than a dozen anti-gun laws that infringe on
individuals' due process rights, destroy family-owned businesses,
criminalize ordinary behavior, and drive hardworking Coloradans out of
the state. These actions represent not governance but hostility toward the
people whose rights this general assembly is sworn to protect.
(c) The founding fathers did not draft the United States
constitution as a suggestion, nor did they leave its meaning open to
political fashion or activist reinterpretation. They wrote it plainly and
deliberately to restrain government power. The second amendment could
not be more clear: "[T]he right of the people to keep and bear arms shall
not be infringed." The rights protected by the second amendment are not
limited, not conditional, and not negotiable.
(d) The second amendment does not exist for sport, recreation, or
even personal defense alone. Its core purpose is to ensure that ultimate
power remains with the people, not centralized in an overreaching
government that believes itself immune from constitutional limits. Every
attempt to weaken, regulate, or nullify rights protected by the second
amendment is an attempt to consolidate power away from the citizenry
and toward the state.
(2) The general assembly further finds that:
(a) An overwhelming majority of firearm restrictions enacted in
Colorado since 2013 are incompatible with the text, history, and tradition
of the second amendment, the constitutional standard affirmed by the
United States supreme court in N.Y. State Rifle & Pistol Association v.
Bruen, 597 U.S. 1 (2022). The legislators and lobbyists responsible for
these laws have demonstrated either willful ignorance or outright
-4- HB26-1021

contempt for that standard.
(b) Colorado's legislative process has been captured by a
well-funded out-of-state anti-gun lobby and its billionaire donors whose
influence drowns out the voices of ordinary Coloradans and pressures
lawmakers to advance unconstitutional policies regardless of their
consequences;
(c) During the very period in which gun control laws have
multiplied, Colorado has experienced a sustained and alarming rise in
violent crime. The state has ranked first in the nation for motor vehicle
theft and has ranked consistently among the most dangerous states in the
country, which is clear evidence that disarming the law-abiding has not,
and will not, stop criminal violence.
(d) Law-abiding firearm carriers stop thousands of crimes
annually, with estimates ranging from 60,000 to 90,000 crimes stopped
each year to estimates of as many as 1.6 to 2.5 million defensive actions
per year involving firearms, based on self-reported surveys;
(e) The people of Colorado have been subjected to escalating
lawlessness, organized criminal activity, and unchecked violence while
simultaneously being stripped of their ability to defend themselves. They
have been told to rely on a system that repeatedly fails them while their
constitutional rights are treated as obstacles rather than guarantees.
(3) The general assembly further declares that:
(a) The laws repealed in this act are blatant violations of the
second amendment; leave Coloradans more vulnerable to both domestic
and foreign threats; embolden criminals while punishing the innocent;
and represent a direct threat to the liberty, security, and self-determination
of the people of this great state; and
-5- HB26-1021

(b) The right to keep and bear arms is not a privilege granted by
government; it is a safeguard against government overreach. Colorado
will no longer be complicit in its erosion.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 1-13-724,
1-13-726, article 27 of title 6, 16-2.5-121.5, 18-1-1001 (3)(a)(I)(C) and
(9), 18-12-105, 18-12-105.3, 18-12-105.5, 18-12-111.5, 18-12-112,
18-12-114, 18-12-114.5, 18-12-115, 18-12-116, 18-12-117, part 3 of
article 12 of title 18, 18-12-401 (6), 18-12-401.5, 18-12-405, 18-12-406,
18-12-407, part 5 of article 12 of title 18, 22-1-150, 24-33.5-424.7,
24-35-122, 25-1-131, part 12 of article 20.5 of title 25, and 33-9-115.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-13-726, repeal
(2)(a), (2)(b), and (4) as follows:
1-13-726. Intimidation of voters or election officials - civil
enforcement - short title - definitions.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(a) "Firearm" has the same meaning as set forth in section
18-1-901 (3)(h).
(b) "Imitation firearm" means an object or device reasonably
capable of being mistaken for a firearm or for a weapon that uses
compressed air or another gas to fire a projectile.
(4) Presumption of engaging in election-related intimidation.
(a) An individual who carries a visible firearm, imitation firearm,
or toy firearm while interacting with or observing any of the activities
described in subsection (3) of this section is presumed, in the absence of
any affirmative showing to the contrary by a preponderance of the
evidence, to have engaged in intimidation prohibited by this section.
-6- HB26-1021

(b) The presumption specified in subsection (4)(a) of this section
does not apply to a law enforcement officer acting within the scope of the
officer's official duties or to a uniformed security guard employed by a
contract security agency, as defined in section 24-33.5-415.4, acting
within the scope of the authority granted by and in the performance of a
contractual agreement for the provision of security services with a person
or entity that owns or controls the facility, building, or location subject to
this section. Accordingly, a plaintiff must allege more than such a law
enforcement officer's or uniformed security guard's possession of a
holstered firearm to state a claim under this section; except that a court
may consider a law enforcement officer's or uniformed security guard's
possession of a firearm in determining whether the law enforcement
officer or uniformed security guard violated subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, recreate and
reenact, with amendments, part 5 of article 21 of title 13 as follows:
PART 5
PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTIONS -
FIREARMS AND AMMUNITION
13-21-501. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT IT IS THE POLICY IN
THIS STATE THAT PRODUCT LIABILITY FOR INJURY, DAMAGE, OR DEATH
CAUSED BY THE DISCHARGE OF A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION MUST BE
BASED ONLY UPON AN ACTUAL DEFECT IN THE DESIGN OR MANUFACTURE
OF THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION AND NOT UPON THE INHERENT
POTENTIAL OF A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION TO CAUSE INJURY, DAMAGE, OR
DEATH WHEN DISCHARGED.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS THAT IT IS THE
-7- HB26-1021

POLICY OF THIS STATE THAT A CIVIL ACTION IN TORT FOR ANY REMEDY
ARISING FROM PHYSICAL OR EMOTIONAL INJURY, PHYSICAL DAMAGE, OR
DEATH CAUSED BY THE DISCHARGE OF A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION MUST
BE BASED ONLY UPON AN ACTUAL DEFECT IN THE DESIGN OR
MANUFACTURE OF THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION OR UPON THE
COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION OF A STATE OR FEDERAL STATUTE OR
REGULATION AND NOT UPON ANY OTHER THEORY OF LIABILITY. THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ALSO FINDS THAT A FIREARMS OR AMMUNITION
MANUFACTURER, IMPORTER, OR DEALER SHALL NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR
THE ACTIONS OF ANOTHER PERSON UNDER ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY.
13-21-502. Product liability action - definition.
AS USED IN THIS PART 5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION" MEANS A CLAIM FOR DAMAGES
BROUGHT AGAINST A MANUFACTURER, DISTRIBUTOR, IMPORTER, OR
SELLER OF FIREARMS OR AMMUNITION ALLEGING A DEFECT IN THE DESIGN
OR MANUFACTURE OF A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION.
13-21-503. Determination of defect - burden of proof.
(1) IN A PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION, WHETHER A FIREARM OR
AMMUNITION IS DEEMED DEFECTIVE IN DESIGN MUST NOT BE BASED UPON
ITS POTENTIAL TO CAUSE INJURY, DAMAGE, OR DEATH WHEN DISCHARGED.
(2) THE PLAINTIFF HAS THE BURDEN TO PROVE, IN ADDITION TO
ANY OTHER ELEMENTS REQUIRED TO BE PROVEN:
(a) IN A PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION ALLEGING A DESIGN DEFECT,
THAT THE ACTUAL DESIGN WAS DEFECTIVE AND THAT THE DEFECTIVE
DESIGN WAS THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF THE INJURY, DAMAGE, OR DEATH;
AND
(b) IN A PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION ALLEGING A DEFECT IN
-8- HB26-1021

MANUFACTURE, THAT THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION WAS MANUFACTURED
AT VARIANCE FROM ITS DESIGN AND THAT THE DEFECTIVE MANUFACTURE
WAS THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF THE INJURY, DAMAGE, OR DEATH.
(3) THE INHERENT POTENTIAL OF A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION TO
CAUSE INJURY, DAMAGE, OR DEATH WHEN DISCHARGED IS NOT A BASIS FOR
A FINDING THAT THE PRODUCT IS DEFECTIVE IN DESIGN OR MANUFACTURE.
13-21-504. Proximate cause.
(1) IN A PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION, THE ACTUAL DISCHARGE OF
A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION MUST BE THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF INJURY,
DAMAGE, OR DEATH RESULTING FROM THE USE OF THE PRODUCT AND NOT
THE INHERENT CAPABILITY OF THE PRODUCT TO CAUSE INJURY, DAMAGE,
OR DEATH.
(2) THE MANUFACTURER'S, IMPORTER'S, OR DISTRIBUTOR'S
PLACEMENT OF A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION IN THE STREAM OF COMMERCE,
EVEN IF THE PLACEMENT IS FOUND TO BE FORESEEABLE, IS NOT CONDUCT
DEEMED SUFFICIENT TO CONSTITUTE THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF INJURY,
DAMAGE, OR DEATH RESULTING FROM A THIRD PARTY'S USE OF THE
PRODUCT.
(3) IN A PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION CONCERNING THE
ACCIDENTAL DISCHARGE OF A FIREARM, THE MANUFACTURER'S,
IMPORTER'S, OR DISTRIBUTOR'S PLACEMENT OF THE PRODUCT IN THE
STREAM OF COMMERCE IS NOT CONDUCT DEEMED SUFFICIENT TO
CONSTITUTE PROXIMATE CAUSE, EVEN IF ACCIDENTAL DISCHARGE IS
FOUND TO BE FORESEEABLE.
(4) IN ADDITION TO ANY LIMITATION OF AN ACTION SET FORTH IN
SECTION 13-80-119, IN A PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION BROUGHT BY THE
PERSON WHO COMMITTED A CRIMINAL ACT, IT IS AN ABSOLUTE DEFENSE
-9- HB26-1021

THAT THE INJURY, DAMAGE, OR DEATH IMMEDIATELY RESULTED FROM THE
USE OF THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION DURING THE COMMISSION OF THE
CRIMINAL ACT THAT IS A FELONY OR MISDEMEANOR.
13-21-505. Limitations on actions - award of fees.
(1) AN INDIVIDUAL OR PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ENTITY MAY NOT BRING
AN ACTION IN TORT, OTHER THAN A PRODUCT LIABILITY ACTION, AGAINST
A FIREARMS OR AMMUNITION MANUFACTURER, IMPORTER, OR DEALER FOR
ANY REMEDY ARISING FROM PHYSICAL OR EMOTIONAL INJURY, PHYSICAL
DAMAGE, OR DEATH CAUSED BY THE DISCHARGE OF A FIREARM OR
AMMUNITION.
(2) A FIREARMS OR AMMUNITION MANUFACTURER, IMPORTER, OR
DEALER SHALL NOT, IN ANY TYPE OF ACTION, BE HELD LIABLE AS A THIRD
PARTY FOR THE ACTIONS OF ANOTHER PERSON.
(3) THE COURT, UPON THE FILING OF A MOTION TO DISMISS
PURSUANT TO RULE 12 (b) OF THE COLORADO RULES OF CIVIL PROCEDURE,
SHALL DISMISS ANY ACTION BROUGHT AGAINST A FIREARMS OR
AMMUNITION MANUFACTURER, IMPORTER, OR DEALER THAT THE COURT
DETERMINES IS PROHIBITED BY SUBSECTION (1) OR (2) OF THIS SECTION.
UPON DISMISSAL PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3), THE COURT SHALL
AWARD REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES, IN ADDITION TO COSTS, TO EACH
DEFENDANT NAMED IN THE ACTION.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, A
FIREARMS OR AMMUNITION MANUFACTURER, IMPORTER, OR DEALER MAY
BE SUED IN TORT FOR ANY DAMAGES PROXIMATELY CAUSED BY AN ACT OF
THE MANUFACTURER, IMPORTER, OR DEALER IN VIOLATION OF A STATE OR
FEDERAL STATUTE OR REGULATION. IN ANY ACTION BROUGHT PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (4), THE PLAINTIFF HAS THE BURDEN OF PROVING BY
-10- HB26-1021

CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE DEFENDANT VIOLATED THE
STATE OR FEDERAL STATUTE OR REGULATION.
13-21-506. Applicability of this part 5.
THIS PART 5 DOES NOT BAR RECOVERY WHEN THE PLAINTIFF
PROVES THAT THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF AN INJURY, DAMAGE, OR DEATH
WAS A FIREARM OR AMMUNITION THAT CONTAINED A DEFECT IN
MANUFACTURE CAUSING THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION TO BE AT
VARIANCE FROM ITS DESIGN OR THAT THE FIREARM OR AMMUNITION WAS
DESIGNED SO THAT IT DID NOT FUNCTION IN THE MANNER REASONABLY
EXPECTED BY THE ORDINARY CONSUMER OF THE PRODUCT.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 16-2.5-102
as follows:
16-2.5-102. Certified peace officer - P.O.S.T. certification
required.
The following peace officers shall meet all the standards imposed
by law on a peace officer and shall be certified by the P.O.S.T. board: A
chief of police, a police officer, a sheriff, an undersheriff, a deputy
sheriff, a Colorado state patrol officer, a town marshal, a deputy town
marshal, a reserve police officer, a reserve deputy sheriff, a reserve
deputy town marshal, a police officer or reserve police officer employed
by a state institution of higher education, a department of revenue auto
industry division employee identified in section 16-2.5-122, a department
of revenue firearms dealer division employee identified in section
16-2.5-121.5 (2), a Colorado wildlife officer, a Colorado parks and
recreation officer, a Colorado police administrator or police officer
employed by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo, an attorney
general criminal investigator, a community parole officer, a public transit
-11- HB26-1021

officer, a municipal court marshal, administrators of judicial security, the
department of corrections inspector general, and a Colorado ranger.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-102, amend
(1) as follows:
18-12-102. Possessing a dangerous or illegal weapon -
affirmative defense - definition.
(1) As used in this section, the term "dangerous weapon" means
a firearm silencer, machine gun, rapid-fire device, short shotgun, or short
rifle.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-112.5, amend
(1)(b) and (3)(a); and repeal (1)(a.3), (1)(a.5), and (1)(c) as follows:
18-12-112.5. Firearms transfers by licensed dealers - sale and
purchase - background check required - penalty - definitions.
(1) (a.3) A person who is a licensed gun dealer shall not make or
facilitate the sale of a firearm to a person who is less than twenty-one
years of age.
(a.5) It is unlawful for a person who is less than twenty-one years
of age to purchase a firearm. This subsection (1)(a.5) and subsection
(1)(a.3) of this section do not apply if:
(I) The person is an active member of the United States armed
forces while on duty and serving in conformance with the policies of the
United States armed forces; or
(II) The person is a peace officer, as described in section
16-2.5-101, while on duty and serving in conformance with the policies
of the employing agency, as set forth in section 16-2.5-101 and section
16-2.5-135; or
(III) An individual certified by the P.O.S.T. board pursuant to
-12- HB26-1021

section 16-2.5-102.
(b) Transferring or selling a firearm in violation of this subsection
(1) is a class 1 misdemeanor.
(c) Purchasing a firearm in violation of this subsection (1) is a
class 2 misdemeanor.
(3) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) "Licensed gun dealer" has the same meaning set forth in
section 18-12-506 MEANS A FEDERAL FIREARMS LICENSEE AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 18-12-101.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-201, amend
(1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2); and recreate and reenact, with
amendments, (1)(b) as follows:
18-12-201. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds that:
(a) There exists a widespread inconsistency among jurisdictions
within the state with regard to the issuance of permits to carry concealed
handguns AND IDENTIFICATION OF AREAS OF THE STATE WHERE IT IS
LAWFUL TO CARRY CONCEALED HANDGUNS;
(b) THIS INCONSISTENCY AMONG JURISDICTIONS CREATES PUBLIC
UNCERTAINTY REGARDING THE AREAS OF THE STATE IN WHICH IT IS
LAWFUL TO CARRY CONCEALED HANDGUNS;
(c) Inconsistency regarding issuance of permits results in the
arbitrary and capricious denial of permits to carry concealed handguns
based on the jurisdiction of residence rather than the qualifications for
obtaining a permit;
(d) Officials of local governments are uniquely equipped to make
determinations as to where concealed handguns can be carried in their
-13- HB26-1021

local jurisdictions; and THE CRITERIA AND PROCEDURES FOR THE LAWFUL
CARRYING OF CONCEALED HANDGUNS HISTORICALLY HAS BEEN
REGULATED BY STATE STATUTE AND SHOULD BE CONSISTENT
THROUGHOUT THE STATE TO ENSURE CONSISTENT IMPLEMENTATION OF
STATE LAW; AND
(e) It is necessary that the state occupy the field of regulation of
issuing BEARING CONCEALED HANDGUNS SINCE THE ISSUANCE OF A
concealed handgun permits because PERMIT IS BASED ON AN INDIVIDUAL'S
CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHT OF SELF-PROTECTION AND there is a prevailing
state interest in ensuring that no A citizen is NOT arbitrarily denied a
concealed handgun permit AND THAT THE LAWS CONTROLLING THE USE OF
THE PERMIT ARE CONSISTENT THROUGHOUT THE STATE.
(2) Based on the findings specified in subsection (1) of this
section, the general assembly concludes that:
(a) The criteria and procedures for issuing permits to carry
PERMITTING AND CARRYING OF concealed handguns is a matter of
statewide concern; AND
(b) It is necessary to provide statewide uniform standards for
issuing permits to carry concealed handguns for self-defense. and
(c) Whether concealed handguns can be carried in a specific area
is a matter of state and local concern.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-214, amend
(1)(a) and (3)(a); and repeal (1)(c), (2.5), and (3.5) as follows:
18-12-214. Authority granted by permit - carrying restrictions
- local authority.
(1) (a) A permit to carry a concealed handgun authorizes the
permittee to carry a concealed handgun in all areas of the state, except as
-14- HB26-1021

specifically limited in this section. A permit does not authorize the
permittee to use a handgun in a manner that would violate a provision of
state law. A LOCAL GOVERNMENT DOES NOT HAVE AUTHORITY TO ADOPT
OR ENFORCE AN ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION THAT CONFLICTS WITH THIS
PART 2.
(c) (I) A local government, including a special district, or the
governing board of an institution of higher education, including the board
of directors of the Auraria higher education center, may enact an
ordinance, resolution, rule, or other regulation that prohibits a permittee
from carrying a concealed handgun in a building or specific area within
the local government's or governing board's jurisdiction, or for a special
district, in a building or specific area under the direct control or
management of the district, including a building or facility managed
pursuant to an agreement between the district and a contractor. An
ordinance, resolution, or other regulation prohibiting a permittee from
carrying a concealed handgun may only impose a civil penalty for a
violation and require the person to leave the premises. For a first offense,
the ordinance, resolution, or other regulation may not impose a fine that
exceeds fifty dollars and may not impose a sentence of incarceration. A
person who does not leave the premises when required may be subject to
criminal penalties.
(II) If a local government or governing board prohibits carrying
a concealed handgun in a building or specific area, the local government
or governing board shall post signs at the public entrances to the building
or specific area informing persons that carrying a concealed handgun is
prohibited in the building or specific area. The notice required by this
section may be included on a sign describing open carry restrictions
-15- HB26-1021

posted in accordance with section 29-11.7-104.
(2.5) A permit issued pursuant to this part 2 does not authorize a
person to carry a concealed handgun into a place where the carrying of
concealed handguns is prohibited by a local ordinance, resolution, rule,
or other regulation.
(3) A permit issued pursuant to this part 2 does not authorize a
person to carry a concealed handgun onto the real property, or into any
improvements erected thereon, of a public elementary, middle, junior
high, or high school; except that:
(a) A permittee may have a handgun on the real property of the
public school so long as the handgun remains in the permittee's vehicle
and, if the permittee leaves the vehicle unattended, the permittee stores
the firearm pursuant to section 18-12-114.5 IS NOT IN THE VEHICLE, THE
HANDGUN IS IN A COMPARTMENT WITHIN THE VEHICLE AND THE VEHICLE
IS LOCKED;
(3.5) A permit issued pursuant to this part 2 does not authorize a
person to carry a concealed handgun:
(a) Onto the real property, or into any improvements erected
thereon, of a licensed child care center, as defined in section 18-12-105.5,
or a public or private college, university, or seminary in violation of
section 18-12-105.5;
(b) In a government building in violation of section 18-12-105.3;
or
(c) At a polling location, drop box, or central count facility, in
violation of section 1-13-724.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-412,
amend (1)(r); and repeal (1)(t) and (10) as follows:
-16- HB26-1021

24-33.5-412. Functions of bureau - legislative review -
interagency cooperation with reporting functions - processing time
for criminal history record checks - computer crime - synthetic
cannabinoids enforcement.
(1) The bureau has the following authority:
(r) To conduct criminal history records checks pursuant to section
24-72-305.3; AND
(t) To investigate throughout the state criminal activity involving
firearms described in article 12 of title 18, including investigating illegal
firearm transfers and attempts, as described in section 18-2-101, to
illegally obtain a firearm. The bureau shall communicate with the
appropriate local law enforcement agency to deconflict investigative
operations and determine investigative responsibilities prior to taking
investigative or enforcement action and shall collaborate with the local
district attorney in the jurisdiction where the bureau is conducting an
investigation in the beginning stages of the investigation. This subsection
(1)(t) does not authorize the bureau to investigate other criminal activity
encountered during a firearms-related investigation without consent from,
or in collaboration with, the local law enforcement agency as required by
law.
(10) An agent or other employee of the bureau who is a peace
officer shall wear and activate a body-worn camera in accordance with
section 24-31-902 when conducting any public-facing part of an
investigation pursuant to subsection (1)(t) of this section.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-11.7-101,
amend (1) introductory portion, (1)(d), (1)(e), and (2); and recreate and
reenact, with amendments, (1)(f) and (1)(g) as follows:
-17- HB26-1021

29-11.7-101. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly hereby finds that:
(d) The state has an interest in the regulation of firearms due to
the ease of transporting firearms between local jurisdictions; and THERE
EXISTS A WIDESPREAD INCONSISTENCY AMONG JURISDICTIONS WITHIN THE
STATE WITH REGARD TO FIREARMS REGULATIONS;
(e) Officials of local governments are uniquely equipped to make
determinations as to regulations necessary in their local jurisdictions. THE
INCONSISTENCY AMONG LOCAL LAWS REGULATING LAWFUL FIREARM
POSSESSION AND OWNERSHIP HAS AN EXTRATERRITORIAL IMPACT ON
STATE CITIZENS AND THE GENERAL PUBLIC BY SUBJECTING THEM TO
CRIMINAL AND CIVIL PENALTIES IN SOME JURISDICTIONS FOR CONDUCT
WHOLLY LAWFUL IN OTHER JURISDICTIONS;
(f) INCONSISTENCY AMONG LOCAL GOVERNMENTS' LAWS
REGULATING THE POSSESSION AND OWNERSHIP OF FIREARMS RESULTS IN
INDIVIDUALS BEING TREATED DIFFERENTLY UNDER THE LAW SOLELY ON
THE BASIS OF WHERE THEY RESIDE, AND AN INDIVIDUAL'S RESIDENCE IN A
PARTICULAR COUNTY OR CITY OR CITY AND COUNTY IS NOT A RATIONAL
CLASSIFICATION WHEN IT IS THE BASIS FOR DENIAL OF EQUAL TREATMENT
UNDER THE LAW;
(g) THE INCONSISTENCY AMONG LOCAL LAW PLACES CITIZENS IN
THE POSITION OF NOT KNOWING WHEN THEY MAY BE VIOLATING THE
LOCAL LAWS AND THEREFORE BEING UNABLE TO AVOID VIOLATING THE
LAW AND BECOMING SUBJECT TO CRIMINAL AND OTHER PENALTIES.
(2) Based on the findings specified in subsection (1) of this
section, the general assembly concludes that: the regulation of firearms
is a matter of state and local concern.
-18- HB26-1021

(a) THE REGULATION OF FIREARMS IS A MATTER OF STATEWIDE
CONCERN; AND
(b) IT IS NECESSARY TO PROVIDE STATEWIDE LAWS CONCERNING
THE POSSESSION AND OWNERSHIP OF A FIREARM TO ENSURE THAT
LAW-ABIDING PERSONS ARE NOT UNFAIRLY PLACED IN THE POSITION OF
UNKNOWINGLY COMMITTING CRIMES INVOLVING FIREARMS.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 29-11.7-103
as follows:
29-11.7-103. Local regulations governing firearms permitted.
(1) Unless otherwise expressly prohibited pursuant to state law,
A local government may SHALL NOT enact an ordinance, regulation, or
other law governing or prohibiting THAT PROHIBITS the sale, purchase,
transfer, or possession of a firearm, ammunition, or firearm component
or accessory that a person may lawfully sell, purchase, transfer, or possess
under state or federal law. The local ordinance, regulation, or other law
may not impose a requirement on the sale, purchase, transfer, or
possession of a firearm, ammunition, or firearm component or accessory
that is less restrictive than state law, and any less restrictive AN
ordinance, regulation, or other law enacted by a local government before
the effective date of this section, as amended in 2021 2026, THAT
CONFLICTS WITH THIS SECTION is void and unenforceable. A local
ordinance, regulation, or other law governing the sale, purchase, transfer,
or possession of a firearm, ammunition, or firearm component or
accessory may only impose a criminal penalty for a violation upon a
person who knew or reasonably should have known that the person's
conduct was prohibited.
(2) Nothing in this section requires the Colorado bureau of
-19- HB26-1021

investigation to consider anything other than state or federal law in its
background approval process and determinations.
(3) Nothing in this section authorizes a local government to
restrict the manufacture or sale of items pursuant to a United States
military or law enforcement procurement contract.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-36-125 as
follows:
24-36-125. Return of money from repealed firearms training
and safety course cash fund - return of gifts, grants, and donations
made for repealed voluntary waiver of the right to purchase a
firearm program - repeal.
(1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE BALANCE OF THE
FIREARMS TRAINING AND SAFETY COURSE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
33-9-115 (5)(b), AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN 2026, AS FOLLOWS:
(a) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL RETURN ANY FEES PAID INTO THE FUND TO THE INDIVIDUAL WHO
PAID THE FEE. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL WORK WITH THE DIVISION OF
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CREATED IN SECTION 33-9-104 TO IDENTIFY FEE
PAYERS, AND THE DIVISION OF PARKS AND WILDLIFE SHALL ASSIST THE
STATE TREASURER IN CARRYING OUT THIS SUBSECTION (1)(a).
(b) ON JANUARY 15, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER THE REMAINING BALANCE OF THE FUND TO THE PARKS AND
OUTDOOR RECREATION CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 33-10-111 (1), UP
TO THE AMOUNT TRANSFERRED FROM THE PARKS AND OUTDOOR
RECREATION CASH FUND TO THE FIREARMS TRAINING AND SAFETY COURSE
CASH FUND PURSUANT TO SECTION 33-9-115 (5)(c), AS IT EXISTED PRIOR
TO ITS REPEAL IN 2026.
-20- HB26-1021

(c) IF THERE IS UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE
FIREARMS TRAINING AND SAFETY COURSE CASH FUND AFTER THE
TRANSFER MADE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION, ON
FEBRUARY 1, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL
UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FIREARMS TRAINING
AND SAFETY COURSE CASH FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(2) (a) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER
SHALL RETURN TO EACH GRANTOR OR DONOR THE AMOUNT OF THE
GRANTOR'S OR DONOR'S GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS IN SUPPORT OF THE
VOLUNTARY WAIVER OF THE RIGHT TO PURCHASE A FIREARM PROGRAM
CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-424.7, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL
IN 2026. IF THE BALANCE OF THE GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS IS
INSUFFICIENT TO RETURN THE FULL AMOUNT OF EACH GIFT, GRANT, OR
DONATION, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL RETURN TO EACH GRANTOR OR
DONOR THE REMAINING BALANCE IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS PROPORTIONAL
TO THE GRANTOR'S OR DONOR'S SHARE OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS. THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY SHALL
ASSIST THE STATE TREASURER IN CARRYING OUT THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a).
(b) IF ON FEBRUARY 1, 2027, AFTER RETURNING MONEY TO
GRANTORS AND DONORS PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, THERE IS UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY REMAINING
FROM THE BALANCE OF GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS MADE IN SUPPORT
OF THE VOLUNTARY WAIVER OF THE RIGHT TO PURCHASE A FIREARM
PROGRAM, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER ALL OF THE
REMAINING UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY TO THE GENERAL
FUND.
(3) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30, 2027.
-21- HB26-1021

SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 11-30-127
as follows:
11-30-127. Merchant code for firearms.
A payment card network, as defined in section 6-27-201 (7), or a
merchant acquirer, as defined in section 6-27-201 (5), shall comply with
part 2 of article 27 of title 6.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 11-105-211
as follows:
11-105-211. Merchant code for firearms.
A payment card network, as defined in section 6-27-201 (7), or a
merchant acquirer, as defined in section 6-27-201 (5), shall comply with
part 2 of article 27 of title 6.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-14-105.5,
amend (4)(c) and (9)(a) introductory portion; and repeal (8)(a) and (8)(c)
as follows:
13-14-105.5. Civil protection orders - prohibition on
possessing or purchasing a firearm.
(4) Relinquishment options. To satisfy the requirement in
subsection (2) of this section, the respondent shall either:
(c) Sell or otherwise transfer the firearm or ammunition to a
private party who may legally possess the firearm or ammunition. except
that a respondent who sells or transfers a firearm pursuant to this
subsection (4)(c) shall satisfy all of the provisions of section 18-12-112
concerning private firearms transfers, including but not limited to the
performance of a criminal background check of the transferee.
(8) Relinquishment to a private party.
(a) If a respondent sells or otherwise transfers a firearm or
-22- HB26-1021

ammunition to a private party who may legally possess the firearm or
ammunition, as described in subsection (4)(c) of this section, the
respondent shall acquire:
(I) From the federally licensed firearms dealer, a written receipt
and signed declaration memorializing the transfer, which receipt must be
dated and signed by the respondent, the transferee, and the federally
licensed firearms dealer; and
(II) From the federally licensed firearms dealer who requests from
the bureau a criminal background check of the transferee, as described in
section 18-12-112, a written statement of the results of the criminal
background check.
(c) Notwithstanding section 18-12-112, if a private party elects to
store a firearm for a respondent pursuant to this section, the private party
shall not return the firearm to the respondent unless the private party
acquires from the federally licensed firearms dealer who requests from
the bureau a background check of the respondent, a written statement of
the results of the background check authorizing the return of the firearm
to the respondent.
(9) Requirement to file signed declaration.
(a) The respondent shall file a copy of the signed declaration
issued pursuant to subsection (6) OR (7)(a)(III) or (8)(a)(I) of this section
and, if applicable, the written statement of the results of a criminal
background check performed on the respondent, as described in
subsection (8)(a)(II) of this section, with the court as proof of the
relinquishment at the same time the respondent files the signed affidavit
pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section. The signed declaration and
written statement filed pursuant to this subsection (9) are IS only available
-23- HB26-1021

for inspection by the court and the parties to the proceeding. If a
respondent fails to timely transfer or sell a firearm or file the signed
declaration or written statement as described in this subsection (9):
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-6-801, amend
(8)(d)(III), (8)(e)(III), and (8)(i)(I); and repeal (8)(h)(I) and (8)(h)(III) as
follows:
18-6-801. Domestic violence - sentencing.
(8) (d) Relinquishment options. To satisfy the requirement in
subsection (8)(b) of this section, the defendant shall either:
(III) Sell or otherwise transfer the firearm or ammunition to a
private party who may legally possess the firearm or ammunition. except
that a defendant who sells or transfers a firearm pursuant to this
subsection (8)(d)(III) shall satisfy all of the provisions of section
18-12-112 concerning private firearms transfers, including but not limited
to the performance of a criminal background check of the transferee.
(e) Compliance hearing and affidavit.
(III) If the defendant possessed a firearm at the time of the
qualifying incident giving rise to the duty to relinquish the firearm
pursuant to this section but transferred or sold the firearm to a private
party prior to sentencing, the defendant shall disclose the sale or transfer
of the firearm to the private party in the affidavit described in subsection
(8)(e)(II) of this section. The defendant, within seven business days after
sentencing, shall acquire a written receipt and signed declaration that
complies with subsection (8)(h)(I)(A) of this section MEMORIALIZING THE
SALE OR TRANSFER, and the defendant shall file the signed declaration at
the same time the defendant files the affidavit pursuant to subsection
(8)(e)(II) of this section.
-24- HB26-1021

(h) Relinquishment to a private party.
(I) If a defendant sells or otherwise transfers a firearm or
ammunition to a private party who may legally possess the firearm or
ammunition, as described in subsection (8)(d)(III) of this section, the
defendant shall acquire:
(A) From the federally licensed firearms dealer, a written receipt
and signed declaration memorializing the transfer, which receipt must be
dated and signed by the defendant, the transferee, and the federally
licensed firearms dealer; and
(B) From the federally licensed firearms dealer who requests from
the bureau a criminal background check of the transferee, as described in
section 18-12-112, a written statement of the results of the criminal
background check.
(III) Notwithstanding section 18-12-112, if a private party elects
to store a firearm for a defendant pursuant to this subsection (8), the
private party shall not return the firearm to the defendant unless the
private party acquires from the federally licensed firearms dealer, who
requests from the bureau a criminal background check of the defendant,
a written statement of the results of the criminal background check
authorizing the return of the firearm to the defendant.
(i) Requirement to file signed declaration.
(I) The defendant shall file a copy of the signed declaration issued
pursuant to subsection (8)(f) OR (8)(g)(I)(C) or (8)(h)(I)(A) of this section
and, if applicable, the written statement of the results of a criminal
background check performed on the defendant, as described in subsection
(8)(h)(I)(B) of this section, with the court as proof of the relinquishment
at the same time the defendant files the signed affidavit pursuant to
-25- HB26-1021

subsection (8)(e)(II) of this section. The signed declaration and written
statement filed pursuant to this subsection (8)(i) are IS only available for
inspection by the court and the parties to the proceeding. If a defendant
fails to timely transfer or sell a firearm or file the signed declaration or
written statement as described in this subsection (8)(i)(I):
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-6-803.5, amend
(1)(c)(II) as follows:
18-6-803.5. Crime of violation of a protection order - penalty
- peace officers' duties - definitions.
(1) A person commits the crime of violation of a protection order
if, after the person has been personally served with a protection order that
identifies the person as a restrained person or otherwise has acquired from
the court or law enforcement personnel actual knowledge of the contents
of a protection order that identifies the person as a restrained person, the
person:
(c) (II) Violates a mandatory protection order issued pursuant to
section 18-1-1001, PRIOR TO THE REPEAL OF SECTION 18-1-1001 (9) IN
2026, that includes terms required by section 18-1-1001 (9) by:
(A) Possessing or attempting to purchase or receive a firearm or
ammunition while the protection order is in effect; or
(B) Failing to timely file a signed affidavit or written statement
with the court as described in section 18-1-1001 (9)(i), PRIOR TO ITS
REPEAL IN 2026, or 18-6-801 (8)(i).
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-105.6,
amend (1)(a) and (2)(a) as follows:
18-12-105.6. Limitation on local ordinances regarding
firearms in private vehicles.
-26- HB26-1021

(1) The general assembly hereby finds that:
(a) A person carrying a weapon in a private automobile or other
private means of conveyance for hunting or for lawful protection of such
person's or another's person or property as permitted in sections
18-12-105 (2)(b) and 18-12-105.5 (3)(c), may tend to travel within a
county, city and county, or municipal jurisdiction or in or through
different county, city and county, and municipal jurisdictions, en route to
the person's destination;
(2) (a) Based on the findings specified in subsection (1) of this
section, the general assembly concludes that the carrying of weapons in
private automobiles or other private means of conveyance for hunting or
for lawful protection of a person's or another's person or property while
traveling into, through, or within, a municipal, county, or city and county
jurisdiction, regardless of the number of times the person stops in a
jurisdiction, is a matter of statewide concern and except as described in
section 18-12-114.5, is not an offense.
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-12-107
as follows:
18-12-107. Penalty for second offense.
Any person who has within five years previously been convicted
of a violation under section 18-12-103 18-12-105, or 18-12-106 shall,
upon conviction for a second or subsequent offense under the same
section, be guilty of a class 5 felony.
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-108, amend
(7)(ggg); and repeal (7)(ss), (7)(aaa), (7)(iii), and (7)(jjj) as follows:
18-12-108. Possession of weapons by previous offenders.
(7) In addition to a conviction for felony crime as defined in
-27- HB26-1021

section 24-4.1-302 (1), a felony conviction or adjudication for one of the
following felonies prohibits a person from possessing, using, or carrying
upon the person a firearm, as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(h), or any
other weapon that is subject to this article 12 pursuant to subsection (1)
or (3) of this section:
(ss) Unlawfully carrying a weapon in violation of section
18-12-105.5;
(aaa) Possessing a large-capacity magazine during the commission
of a crime of violence in violation of section 18-12-302 (1)(c);
(ggg) A special offender in violation of section 18-18-407
(1)(d)(II); AND
(iii) Unlawful conduct involving an unserialized firearm, frame,
or receiver, as described in section 18-12-111.5; and
(jjj) Unlawful manufacture, distribution, transfer, sale, or purchase
of a specified semiautomatic firearm, as described in section 18-12-116.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-111, repeal
(3) and (4) as follows:
18-12-111. Unlawful purchase of firearms - report to law
enforcement - unlawful attempted purchase while subject to a
voluntary waiver - penalties.
(3) (a) If a firearms dealer who holds a state permit to deal
firearms pursuant to section 18-12-401.5 reasonably believes, knows or
should know, or becomes aware after a transfer, that a person, including
an employee, purchased or attempted to purchase a firearm in violation
of subsection (1) of this section, the dealer shall report that information
to a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the dealer's place of
business.
-28- HB26-1021

(b) Failure to make the report required by this subsection (3)
within forty-eight hours after the dealer becomes aware of an unlawful
firearm purchase or attempted firearm purchase is a violation of state law
concerning the sale of firearms and is subject to the penalties described
in section 18-12-401.5 (7).
(4) (a) A person who attempts to purchase a firearm while subject
to a voluntary waiver of the right to purchase a firearm described in
section 24-33.5-424.7 commits unlawful attempted firearm purchase
while subject to a voluntary waiver. Unlawful attempted firearm purchase
while subject to a voluntary waiver is a civil infraction and shall be
punished by a fine of up to twenty-five dollars.
(b) Section 18-2-101 does not apply to conduct that constitutes a
civil infraction pursuant to this subsection (4).
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-113, amend
(3); and repeal (5) as follows:
18-12-113. Failure to report a lost or stolen firearm -
exception.
(3) This section does not apply to a licensed gun dealer, as defined
in section 18-12-506 FEDERAL FIREARMS LICENSEE.
(5) A person who reports a lost or stolen firearm pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section is immune from criminal prosecution for an
offense in this part 1 related to the storage of firearms and from
prosecution for the civil infraction of unlawful storage of a firearm in a
vehicle as described in section 18-12-114.5.
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-202.5,
amend (3)(d) as follows:
18-12-202.5. Concealed handgun training class - refresher
-29- HB26-1021

class - rules.
(3) A concealed handgun training class must include the following
elements:
(d) Instruction regarding federal and state laws pertaining to the
lawful purchase, ownership, transportation, use, and possession of
firearms, including instruction on extreme risk protection orders
described in article 14.5 of title 13, requirements for reporting lost or
stolen firearms described in section 18-12-113, secure firearms storage
requirements described in section 18-12-114, and any other state law
enacted within five years before the class that pertains to the purchase,
ownership, transportation, use, and possession of firearms;
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-204, repeal
(3)(b) as follows:
18-12-204. Permit contents - validity - carrying requirements.
(3) (b) The provisions of this subsection (3) shall not be construed
to authorize the carrying of a handgun in violation of the provisions of
section 18-12-105 or 18-12-105.5.
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-206, amend
(3)(c) as follows:
18-12-206. Sheriff - issuance or denial of permits - report.
(3) (c) Except for suspected violations of sections 18-12-105 and
18-12-105.5, A peace officer may not use or search a database of
permittees maintained by a law enforcement agency to establish
reasonable suspicion for a traffic stop, or when contacting an individual,
to justify probable cause for a search or seizure of a person or a person's
vehicle or property.
SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-12-403
-30- HB26-1021

as follows:
18-12-403. Record - failure to make - penalty.
Every individual, firm, or corporation who THAT fails to keep the
record required pursuant to section 18-12-402 or section 18-12-111.5
(7)(b), or who THAT refuses to exhibit the record when requested by a
police officer, and any purchaser, lessee, or exchanger of a pistol or
revolver who, in connection with the making of such THE record, gives
false information, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.
SECTION 29. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-2.5-304, amend
(2) introductory portion as follows:
19-2.5-304. Limitations on detention.
(2) A juvenile court shall not order a juvenile who is ten years of
age OLD and older but less than thirteen years of age OLD to detention
unless the juvenile has been arrested for a felony or weapons charge
pursuant to section 18-12-102; 18-12-105, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS
REPEAL IN 2026; 18-12-106; or 18-12-108.5. A preadjudication service
program created pursuant to section 19-2.5-606 shall evaluate a juvenile
described in this subsection (2). The evaluation may result in the juvenile:
SECTION 30. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-2.5-305, amend
(3)(a)(V) introductory portion and (3)(a)(V)(C) as follows:
19-2.5-305. Detention and shelter - hearing - time limits -
findings - review - guardian ad litem appointed - confinement with
adult offenders - restrictions.
(3) (a) (V) A court shall not order further detention for a juvenile
who is ten years of age OLD and older but less than thirteen years of age
OLD unless the juvenile has been arrested or adjudicated for a felony or
weapons charge pursuant to section 18-12-102; 18-12-105, AS IT EXISTED
-31- HB26-1021

PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN 2026; 18-12-106; or 18-12-108.5. The court shall
receive any information having probative value regardless of its
admissibility under the rules of evidence. In determining whether a
juvenile requires detention, the court shall consider the results of the
detention screening instrument. There is a rebuttable presumption that a
juvenile poses a substantial risk of serious harm to others if:
(C) The juvenile is alleged to have committed possessing a
dangerous or illegal weapon, as described in section 18-12-102;
possession of a defaced firearm, as described in section 18-12-103;
unlawfully carrying a concealed weapon, as described in section
18-12-105, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN 2026; unlawfully
carrying a concealed weapon on school, college, or university grounds,
as described in section 18-12-105.5, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL
IN 2026; prohibited use of weapons, as described in section 18-12-106;
illegal discharge of a firearm, as described in section 18-12-107.5; or
illegal possession of a handgun by a juvenile, as described in section
18-12-108.5.
SECTION 31. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-2.5-1123,
amend (2) introductory portion as follows:
19-2.5-1123. Sentencing - mandatory detention - weapons and
crimes of violence.
(2) A juvenile who is less than thirteen years of age OLD may not
be sentenced to detention unless the juvenile has been adjudicated for a
felony or weapons charge pursuant to section 18-12-102; 18-12-105, AS
IT EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN 2026; 18-12-106; or 18-12-108.5. As
an alternative, the juvenile probation department may conduct a
presentence investigation pursuant to section 19-2.5-1101. The
-32- HB26-1021

investigation may result in the juvenile:
SECTION 32. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 19-2.5-1511,
amend (1)(c) as follows:
19-2.5-1511. Juvenile detention services and facilities to be
provided by department of human services - education - expenses -
definition.
(1) (c) The department of human services is not required to
receive and provide care for any juvenile who is ten years of age OLD and
older but less than thirteen years of age OLD, unless such juvenile has
been arrested or adjudicated for a felony or weapons charge pursuant to
section 18-12-102; 18-12-105, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN
2026; 18-12-106; or 18-12-108.5.
SECTION 33. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-424,
amend (3)(b.3)(X); and repeal (3)(b)(III), (3)(b.3)(XII), and
(3)(b.3)(XIII) as follows:
24-33.5-424. National instant criminal background check
system - state point of contact - fee - grounds for denial of firearm
transfer - appeal - rule-making - unlawful acts - instant criminal
background check cash fund - creation.
(3) (b) (III) In addition to the grounds for denial specified in
subsections (3)(a), (3)(b)(I), and (3)(b.3) of this section, the bureau shall
deny a transfer of a firearm to a person who has voluntarily waived the
right to purchase a firearm, as described in section 24-33.5-424.7, while
the waiver is in effect.
(b.3) In addition to the grounds for denial specified in subsections
(3)(a) and (3)(b) of this section, the bureau shall deny a transfer of a
firearm if the prospective transferee has been convicted of any of the
-33- HB26-1021

following offenses committed on or after June 19, 2021, if the offense is
classified as a misdemeanor, or if the prospective transferee has been
convicted in another state or jurisdiction, including a military or federal
jurisdiction, of an offense that, if committed in Colorado, would
constitute any of the following offenses classified as a misdemeanor
offense, within five years prior to the transfer:
(X) Possession of an illegal weapon, as described in section
18-12-102 (4); OR
(XII) Unlawful conduct involving an unserialized firearm, frame,
or receiver, as described in section 18-12-111.5; or
(XIII) Unlawful manufacture, distribution, transfer, sale, or
purchase of a specified semiautomatic firearm, as described in section
18-12-116.
SECTION 34. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-103-907.5,
repeal (3)(a)(I) as follows:
24-103-907.5. State purchases of firearms and ammunition -
contractor or bidder - rules - legislative intent - definitions.
(3) (a) During a governmental body's contracting process, a
governmental body's sourcing method process conducted pursuant to the
code, as applicable, or upon request during the term of a contract with a
governmental body relating to the procurement of firearms or items
regulated pursuant to the "National Firearms Act", a firearms contractor
or a firearms bidder shall, if applicable:
(I) Comply with the requirements of section 18-12-401.5 (1) to
engage in the business of dealing in firearms in the state, if applicable;
SECTION 35. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-2706,
repeal (5)(a)(I)(C) as follows:
-34- HB26-1021

24-33.5-2706. Trauma-informed practices for school safety
drills - work group - creation - purpose - membership - notice to
revisor of statutes - definitions - repeal.
(5) (a) (I) The work group consists of the following nonvoting
members:
(C) A representative from the office of gun violence prevention
created in section 25-20.5-1202, appointed by the executive director of
the department of public health and environment;
SECTION 36. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-11.7-105,
amend (4); and repeal (5) as follows:
29-11.7-105. Firearm serial number check - procedure -
processing fee - penalty.
(4) If the federal government allows a federal firearms licensee to
access the federal government's firearm tracing program to allow the
federal firearms licensee to perform a firearm serial number check, the
federal firearms licensee may perform the firearms serial number check
themself. The federal firearms licensee is still subject to the reporting
requirements described in subsection (5) of this section. This subsection
(4) will take effect as soon as the technology and infrastructure for a
federal firearms licensee to perform a firearm serial number search is
available.
(5) (a) If a firearms dealer who holds a state permit to deal
firearms pursuant to section 18-12-401.5 reasonably believes, knows or
should know, or becomes aware that a person sold or attempted to sell a
firearm that is stolen, lost, or involved in an open criminal investigation,
the dealer shall report that information to a law enforcement agency with
jurisdiction over the dealer's place of business.
-35- HB26-1021

(b) Failure to make the report as required by this subsection (5)
within forty-eight hours after the dealer reasonably believes, knows or
should know, or becomes aware of the firearm being stolen, lost, or
involved in an open criminal investigation is subject to the penalties
described in section 18-12-401.5 (7).
SECTION 37. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-37-103, amend
(8) as follows:
39-37-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 37, unless the context otherwise requires:
(8) "Firearms dealer" or "gun dealer" means any person who is a
federally licensed firearms dealer as defined in section 18-12-101 (1)(g)
or a licensed gun dealer as defined in section 18-12-506 (6), AS IT
EXISTED PRIOR TO ITS REPEAL IN 2026.
SECTION 38. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-36- HB26-1021